Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Chapter 4 Health Regulations Generally

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1, directs that for the period beginning July 1, 2004, and ending June 30, 2006, services authorized under Wyoming Medical Assistance and Services Act involving the delivery of a child, including prenatal and postpartum care related to the delivery, are to be reimbursed at 90% of the statewide average of the physician's specialty for the services provided as of July 1, 2004, not to exceed 100% of the provider's usual and customary billed charges.

Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 1, as amended by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 3, provides:

Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 2, as amended by Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2, appropriates $200,000 from the general fund to the department of health for the purposes of this act for the purchase of tail coverage, which is to remain available for expenditure until June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 4, directs the department of health to report the additional costs incurred by the increased reimbursement rate under the act and recommendations for modifications to the reimbursement rate for obstetric services under the Medical Assistance and Services Act to the joint appropriations interim committee on or before October 31, 2005.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 5, directs that the $3,000,000 appropriated to the department of health under Laws 2004, ch. 101, § 2, be deappropriated and deposited in the general fund. Section 5 further directs that for the purposes of Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., Act 2, $2,050,000 is to be appropriated from the general fund and $2,600,00 from federal funds to the department of health for the period July 1, 2004 through June 30, 2006.

Laws 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 6, makes this section effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 17, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

AIDS infection as affecting right to attend public school, 60 ALR4th 15.

Sexual partner's tort liability to other partner for fraudulent misrepresentation regarding sterility or use of birth control resulting in pregnancy, 2 ALR5th 301.